Utah statutes.
63B-5-201.   Legislative intent statements.

(1)  If the United States Department of Defense has not provided matching funds to construct the National Guard Armory in Orem by December 31, 1997, the Division of Facilities Construction and Management shall transfer any funds received from issuance of a General Obligation Bond for benefit of the Orem Armory to the Provo Armory for capital improvements.

(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the University of Utah use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct:

(a)  the Health Science East parking structure under the supervision of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority is delegated by the director;

(b)  the Health Science Office Building under the supervision of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority is delegated by the director; and

(c)  the new Student Housing/Olympic Athletes Village under the supervision of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority is delegated by the director.

(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature that Utah State University use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a multipurpose facility under the supervision of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority is delegated by the director.

(4)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Utah Geologic Survey use agency internal funding to plan, design, and construct a sample library facility under the supervision of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority is delegated by the director.

(5) (a)  If legislation introduced in the 1996 General Session to fund the Wasatch State Park Club House does not pass, the State Building Ownership Authority, under authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may be created, to provide up to $1,500,000 for the remodel and expansion of the clubhouse at Wasatch Mountain State Park for the Division of Parks and Recreation, together with additional amounts necessary to:

(i)  pay costs of issuance;

(ii)  pay capitalized interest; and

(iii)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(b)  The State Building Ownership Authority shall work cooperatively with the Division of Parks and Recreation to seek out the most cost effective and prudent lease purchase plan available.

(6) (a)  The State Building Ownership Authority, under authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may be created, to provide up to $835,300 for the construction of a liquor store in the Snyderville area, together with additional amounts necessary to:

(i)  pay costs of issuance;

(ii)  pay capitalized interest; and

(iii)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(b)  The State Building Ownership Authority shall work cooperatively with the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control to seek out the most cost effective and prudent lease purchase plan available.

(7) (a)  The State Building Ownership Authority, under authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may be created, to provide up to $15,000,000 for the construction of the Huntsman Cancer Institute, together with additional amounts necessary to:

(i)  pay costs of issuance;

(ii)  pay capitalized interest; and

(iii)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(b)  The State Building Ownership Authority shall work cooperatively with the University of Utah to seek out the most cost effective and prudent lease purchase plan available.

(c)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the University of Utah lease land to the State Building Ownership Authority for the construction of the Huntsman Cancer Institute facility.

(8) (a)  The State Building Ownership Authority, under authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may be created, to provide up to $857,600 for the construction of an addition to the Human Services facility in Vernal, Utah together with additional amounts necessary to:

(i)  pay costs of issuance;

(ii)  pay capitalized interest; and

(iii)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(b)  The State Building Ownership Authority shall work cooperatively with the Department of Human Services to seek out the most cost effective and prudent lease purchase plan available.

(9) (a)  The State Building Ownership Authority, under authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may be created, to provide up to $3,470,200 for the construction of the Student Services Center, at the College of Eastern Utah, together with additional amounts necessary to:

(i)  pay costs of issuance;

(ii)  pay capitalized interest; and

(iii)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(b)  The State Building Ownership Authority shall work cooperatively with the College of Eastern Utah to seek out the most cost effective and prudent lease purchase plan available.

(10) (a)  Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in Title 53B, Chapter 21, Revenue Bonds, which  prohibits the issuance of revenue bonds payable from legislative appropriations, the State Board of Regents, on behalf of Dixie College, may issue, sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of Dixie College to borrow money on the credit of the income and revenues, including legislative appropriations, of Dixie College, to finance the acquisition of the Dixie Center.

(b) (i)  The bonds or other evidences of indebtedness authorized by this section shall be issued in accordance with Title 53B, Chapter 21, Revenue Bonds, under terms and conditions and in amounts that the board, by resolution, determines are reasonable and necessary and may not exceed $6,000,000 together with additional amounts necessary to:

(A)  pay cost of issuance;

(B)  pay capitalized interest; and

(C)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(ii)  To the extent that future legislative appropriations will be required to provide for payment of debt service in full, the board shall ensure that the revenue bonds are issued containing a clause that provides for payment from future legislative appropriations that are legally available for that purpose.

(11) (a)  The State Building Ownership Authority, under authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may be created, to provide up to $10,479,000 for the construction of a facility for the Courts - Davis County Regional Expansion, together with additional amounts necessary to:

(i)  pay costs of issuance;

(ii)  pay capitalized interest; and

(iii)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(b)  The State Building Ownership Authority shall work cooperatively with the Office of the Court Administrator to seek out the most cost effective and prudent lease purchase plan available.

(12) (a)  The State Building Ownership Authority, under authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may be created, to provide up to $4,200,000 for the purchase and remodel of the Washington County Courthouse, together with additional amounts necessary to:

(i)  pay costs of issuance;

(ii)  pay capitalized interest; and

(iii)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(b)  The State Building Ownership Authority shall work cooperatively with the Office of the Court Administrator to seek out the most cost effective and prudent lease purchase plan available.

(13) (a)  The State Building Ownership Authority, under authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may be created, to provide up to $14,299,700 for the construction of a facility for the State Library and the Division of Services for the Blind and Visually Impaired, together with additional amounts necessary to:

(i)  pay costs of issuance;

(ii)  pay capitalized interest; and

(iii)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(b)  The State Building Ownership Authority shall work cooperatively with the Office of Education and the Governor's Office of Economic Development to seek out the most cost effective and prudent lease purchase plan available.

